District of Columbia statutes.
16-1047

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Uniform Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among States that enact it.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.